Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1814.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1317.4. Possession and Use of Cell Phones.--(a) Except as provided in this section, a student of a public school entity may not possess or use a cell phone during the school day in a school building of the public school entity.(b) Upon entering the school building at the beginning of the school day, the student shall:(1) deposit the cell phone in a lockbox or other secure <--123456789101112131415161718 location for the duration of the school day; or(2) secure the cell phone in a case or pouch with a locking mechanism that prohibits the student from accessing the cell phone during the school day, but which case or pouch is capable of being carried by the student.(c) At the end of the school day, the student may:(1) retrieve the cell phone from the lockbox or other secure location; or(2) unlock the case or pouch described in subsection (b)(2).(d) This section does not apply to a student if:(1) the student:(i) is a member of a volunteer fire company, ambulance or rescue squad; or(ii) has a need for the cell phone due to the medical condition of an immediate family member; and(2) an administrator of the public school entity approves possession and use of the cell phone by the student during the school day in a school building of the public school entity.(e) A public school entity shall develop or update its written policies to implement this section. The written policies shall be subject to the approval of the Department of Education.(f) As used in this section, the term "public school entity" means a school district, independent school, area career and technical school, intermediate unit, charter school or regional charter school . Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.AMENDING THE ACT OF MARCH 10, 1949 (P.L.30, NO.14), ENTITLED "AN ACT RELATING TO THE PUBLIC SCHOOL SYSTEM, INCLUDING CERTAIN PROVISIONS APPLICABLE AS WELL TO PRIVATE AND PAROCHIAL SCHOOLS; AMENDING, REVISING, CONSOLIDATING AND CHANGING THE LAWS RELATING THERETO," IN STUDENT SUPPORTS, PROVIDING FOR BELL-TO-BELL MOBILE DEVICE POLICY.THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA 20250HB1814PN3291 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930313233 HEREBY ENACTS AS FOLLOWS:SECTION 1. THE ACT OF MARCH 10, 1949 (P.L.30, NO.14), KNOWN AS THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949, IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:SECTION 1314-A. BELL-TO-BELL MOBILE DEVICE POLICY.--(A) NO LATER THAN THE START OF THE 2027-2028 SCHOOL YEAR, THE GOVERNING BODY OF EACH SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL ADOPT A POLICY RELATED TO STUDENT POSSESSION AND USE OF MOBILE DEVICES DURING THE SCHOOL DAY WHILE ON SCHOOL PROPERTY.(B) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (C), CONSISTENT WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION, THE GOVERNING BODY OF A SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL ADOPT A POLICY RELATING TO MOBILE DEVICES AND SHALL:(I) PROHIBIT THE USE OF A MOBILE DEVICE DURING THE SCHOOL DAY WHILE ON SCHOOL PROPERTY; AND(II) ESTABLISH THE MANNER IN WHICH A STUDENT'S POSSESSION OF A MOBILE DEVICE IS TO BE RESTRICTED DURING THE SCHOOL DAY WHILE ON SCHOOL PROPERTY.(2) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE A SCHOOL ENTITY TO TAKE POSSESSION OF A STUDENT'S MOBILE DEVICE. IF THE GOVERNING BODY OF A SCHOOL ENTITY ADOPTS A POLICY THAT PERMITS AN EMPLOYE OF A SCHOOL ENTITY TO TAKE POSSESSION OF A STUDENT'S MOBILE DEVICE, THE SCHOOL ENTITY OR SCHOOL EMPLOYE SHALL NOT BE LIABLE FOR ANY DAMAGED OR LOST MOBILE DEVICE IF THE SCHOOL EMPLOYE ACTED IN GOOD FAITH TO SECURE THE MOBILE DEVICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE SCHOOL ENTITY'S POLICY.(3) THE POLICY SHALL INCLUDE APPROPRIATE ENFORCEMENT AND OVERSIGHT PROVISIONS TO ENSURE COMPLIANCE AT A SCHOOL BUILDING.(4) AT THE BEGINNING OF EACH SCHOOL YEAR AND UPON ENROLLMENT, EACH SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN 20250HB1814PN3291 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 NOTIFICATION TO PARENTS AND LEGAL GUARDIANS OF STUDENTS ENROLLED IN THE SCHOOL ENTITY OF THE METHODS FOR A STUDENT, PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN TO SIGN UP FOR EMERGENCY NOTIFICATIONS.(5) AT THE BEGINNING OF EACH SCHOOL YEAR AND UPON ENROLLMENT, EACH SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTIFICATION TO PARENTS AND LEGAL GUARDIANS OF STUDENTS ENROLLED IN THE SCHOOL ENTITY OF THE METHODS TO CONTACT THEIR CHILD DURING THE SCHOOL DAY. METHODS MAY INCLUDE, BUT NOT BE LIMITED TO, THE SCHOOL BUILDING PHONE NUMBER OR AN ELECTRONIC MAIL ADDRESS. THE SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL ENSURE THAT ANY METHOD OF CONTACT PROVIDED TO PARENTS AND LEGAL GUARDIANS UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH IS STAFFED DURING THE SCHOOL DAY.(C) A SCHOOL ENTITY'S POLICY SHALL INCLUDE EXCEPTIONS TO ALLOW LIMITED USE OF A MOBILE DEVICE DURING THE SCHOOL DAY BY A STUDENT WHO:(1) REQUIRES A MOBILE DEVICE DUE TO THE MEDICAL CONDITION, DOCUMENTED BY A MEDICAL PROVIDER, OF THE STUDENT OR AN IMMEDIATE FAMILY MEMBER OF THE STUDENT.(2) HAS AN INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM OR 504 SERVICE AGREEMENT IN WHICH A MOBILE DEVICE IS PART OF THE ACCOMMODATIONS OR SERVICES PROVIDED TO THE STUDENT.(3) IS AN ENGLISH LEARNER AND USES A MOBILE DEVICE FOR TRANSLATION OR OTHER ENGLISH AS A SECOND LANGUAGE PURPOSES.(4) HAS PERMISSION FROM A TEACHER TO USE A MOBILE DEVICE FOR EDUCATIONAL PURPOSES DURING INSTRUCTIONAL TIME, PROVIDED THAT:(I) A SCHOOL-ISSUED DEVICE IS INSUFFICIENT OR UNAVAILABLE FOR THE INSTRUCTIONAL PURPOSES NEEDED BY THE TEACHER;(II) THE PRINCIPAL DETERMINES THAT THE USE OF THE MOBILE DEVICE IS APPROPRIATE FOR INSTRUCTIONAL PURPOSES; AND(III) THE APPROVAL IS FOR A LIMITED CIRCUMSTANCE AND 20250HB1814PN3291 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 DURATION AND DOES NOT PERMIT THE USE OF A MOBILE DEVICE AS A REGULAR PART OF INSTRUCTION.(D) A SCHOOL ENTITY'S POLICY MAY ALLOW A PRINCIPAL OF A SCHOOL BUILDING TO APPROVE AN EXCEPTION NOT AUTHORIZED UNDER SUBSECTION (C). THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY TO THE EXCEPTION:(1) THE PRINCIPAL MUST SUBMIT A NOTIFICATION FOR THE EXCEPTION TO THE CHIEF SCHOOL ADMINISTRATOR OR A DESIGNEE. THE NOTIFICATION SHALL INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING:(I) THE PURPOSE OF THE EXCEPTION.(II) THE DATE, TIME AND DURATION OF THE EXCEPTION.(III) A DESCRIPTION OF TO WHOM THE EXCEPTION SHALL APPLY.(2) THE EXCEPTION MAY NOT EXCEED ONE (1) SCHOOL DAY.(3) THE NOTIFICATION SHALL BE SUBMITTED NO LATER THAN FIVE (5) DAYS AFTER THE SCHOOL DAY ON WHICH THE EXCEPTION OCCURRED.(E) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A SCHOOL ENTITY THAT ADOPTED A POLICY RELATING TO MOBILE DEVICES PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL, NO LATER THAN THE START OF THE 2027-2028 SCHOOL YEAR, AMEND THE EXISTING POLICY, IF NEEDED, TO COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.(F) (1) AT THE BEGINNING OF EACH SCHOOL YEAR, A SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL INFORM PARENTS, LEGAL GUARDIANS, TEACHERS AND STUDENTS OF THE POLICY ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION AND ANY CHANGES TO THE POLICY SINCE THE PREVIOUS SCHOOL YEAR, IF APPLICABLE.(2) NO LATER THAN FIVE (5) BUSINESS DAYS AFTER POSTING A COPY OF THE POLICY OR AMENDED POLICY AS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1), A SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL SUBMIT DOCUMENTATION TO THE DEPARTMENT VERIFYING THAT A COPY OF THE SCHOOL ENTITY'S POLICY OR AMENDED POLICY IS POSTED ON THE SCHOOL ENTITY'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE.20250HB1814PN3291 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (G) AS USED IN THIS SECTION:"504 SERVICE AGREEMENT" SHALL HAVE THE MEANING AS DEFINED IN SECTION 1331.1(E)."CHIEF SCHOOL ADMINISTRATOR" SHALL MEAN THE:(1) SUPERINTENDENT OF A SCHOOL DISTRICT;(2) EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF AN INTERMEDIATE UNIT;(3) CHIEF EXECUTIVE OF A CHARTER SCHOOL, CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL, REGIONAL CHARTER SCHOOL OR MULTIPLE CHARTER SCHOOL ORGANIZATION; OR(4) GOVERNING BODY, OR EQUIVALENT BODY, OF A NONPUBLIC SCHOOL, PRIVATE SCHOOL OR APPROVED PUBLIC SCHOOL."DEPARTMENT" SHALL MEAN THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION OF THE COMMONWEALTH."INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM" SHALL MEAN AN INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM DEVELOPED IN ACCORDANCE WITH 22 PA. CODE § 14.131 (RELATING TO IEP) AND THE INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES EDUCATION ACT (PUBLIC LAW 91-230, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 ET SEQ.)."MOBILE DEVICE" SHALL MEAN A PERSONAL MOBILE TELEPHONE OR OTHER PORTABLE ELECTRONIC DEVICE CAPABLE OF CONNECTING TO THE INTERNET AND ENABLING THE USER TO ACCESS CONTENT ON THE INTERNET, THAT IS NOT OWNED BY A SCHOOL ENTITY OR ISSUED BY A SCHOOL ENTITY TO A STUDENT. A MOBILE DEVICE SHALL INCLUDE A DEVICE WITH WHICH A USER COULD ENGAGE IN A CALL; WRITE, SEND OR RECEIVE A MESSAGE; SEND OR RECEIVE DATA OR AN IMAGE; RECORD, PLAY OR EDIT AUDIO OR VIDEO DATA; PLAY A GAME; OR WATCH A VIDEO. THE TERM DOES NOT INCLUDE A PORTABLE DEVICE THAT MEETS THE DEFINITION OF A DEVICE UNDER 21 U.S.C. § 321 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS GENERALLY) OR A DUAL USE WATCH IF THE WATCH'S WI-FI AND DATA ARE DISABLED.20250HB1814PN3291 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "NONPUBLIC SCHOOL" SHALL HAVE THE MEANING AS DEFINED IN SECTION 923.3-A(B)."POLICY" SHALL MEAN A POLICY ADOPTED BY THE GOVERNING BODY OF A SCHOOL ENTITY UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OR AMENDED UNDER SUBSECTION (F) RELATED TO STUDENT POSSESSION AND USE OF MOBILE DEVICES DURING THE SCHOOL DAY WHILE ON SCHOOL PROPERTY."PRINCIPAL" SHALL MEAN A BUILDING PRINCIPAL, AN ASSISTANT PRINCIPAL, A VICE PRINCIPAL, A SUPERVISOR OF SPECIAL EDUCATION OR A DIRECTOR OF CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION."SCHOOL DAY" SHALL MEAN THE ENTIRETY OF EVERY INSTRUCTIONAL DAY DURING ALL INSTRUCTIONAL AND NON-INSTRUCTIONAL TIME, AS DETERMINED BY THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE SCHOOL ENTITY, INCLUDING HOMEROOM PERIODS, LUNCH, RECESS AND THE TIME MOVING BETWEEN CLASSES."SCHOOL ENTITY" SHALL MEAN A SCHOOL DISTRICT, INTERMEDIATE UNIT, AREA CAREER AND TECHNICAL SCHOOL, CHARTER SCHOOL, REGIONAL CHARTER SCHOOL, PRIVATE SCHOOL, APPROVED PRIVATE SCHOOL, NONPUBLIC SCHOOL OR CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL OPERATING IN THIS COMMONWEALTH.SECTION 2. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY.20250HB1814PN3291 - 7 - 1234567891011121314151617181920